Georgia statutes. TITLE 45 Public Officers and Employees
Article 5 Exemption of Certain Employees from Liability for Services at State Hospitals

45-18-80.
Certain employees retired prior to July 1, 1962, exempt from personal liability for services at state hospitals; cooperation in application and claims process.

Any other provision of this chapter to the contrary notwithstanding, those state employees with at least 34 years of creditable service who retired from state government prior to July 1, 1962, who are entitled to full medical and dental services from a state hospital, as established by the State Board of Health in its March 1, 1962, meeting, shall be exempt from any and all personal liabilities for services at state hospitals.
Such services shall include full medical, dental, psychiatric, skilled and intermediate nursing care, and custodial care as available at state hospitals and shall be considered as part of retirement benefits to such retirees. Such retired employees shall be required to cooperate in the application and claims process for any and all benefits, plans, or programs available for payment of cost of care at state hospitals, but such employees shall be exempt from personal liability for any cost after application of such benefits, plans, or programs.

History.

Code 1981, §

45-18-80

, enacted by Ga. L. 1992, p. 2100, § 1; Ga. L. 1993, p. 91, § 45.

45-18-81.
Legislative intent.

It is the intent of this article to provide that any such state employees currently hospitalized at any state hospital shall be relieved of personal liability for any existing cost of care charges, provided employees or those responsible for employees cooperate and ensure that to the greatest extent possible applications are made for all benefits, plans, and programs available for payment of cost of care at state hospitals.

History.

Code 1981, §

45-18-81

, enacted by Ga. L. 1992, p. 2100, § 1.